District of Columbia statutes.
31-1302

Applicability.

The proceedings authorized by this chapter may be applied to:

(1)

All insurers who are doing, or have done, an insurance business in the District, and against whom claims arising from that business may exist now or in the future;

(2)

All insurers who purport to do an insurance business in the District;

(3)

All insurers who have insureds resident in the District;

(4)

All other persons organized or in the process of organizing with the intent to do an insurance business in the District;

(5)

All title insurance companies subject to the laws of the District;

(6)

All prepaid health care delivery plans;

(7)

All nonprofit service plans and all fraternal benefit societies and beneficial societies; and

(8)

All insurers making contracts of fidelity or surety contracts or other negotiations preliminary to the executions of the contracts.

Oct. 15, 1993, D.C. Law 10-35, § 3, 40 DCR 5773
1981 Ed., § 35-2802.